Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1561
Exempt wages; interstate business; law violation; aiders; abettors.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any person or persons to aid, assist, abet or counsel a violation of section 25-1560, for any purpose whatever.

Laws 1889, c. 25, § 2, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 8108;

C.S.1922, § 9044;

C.S.1929, § 20-1562;

R.S.1943, § 25-1561.